District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.03

Who may make anatomical gift before donor’s death.

Subject to § 7-1531.07, an anatomical gift of a donor’s body or part may be made during the life of the donor for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education in the manner provided in § 7-1531.04 by:

(1)

The donor, if the donor is an adult or if the donor is a minor and is:

(A)

Emancipated; or

(B)

Authorized under state law to apply for a driver’s license because the donor is at least 16 years of age;

(2)

An agent of the donor, unless the power of attorney for health care or other record prohibits the agent from making an anatomical gift;

(3)

A parent of the donor, if the donor is an unemancipated minor; or

(4)

The donor’s guardian.

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 4, 55 DCR 2532
This section is referenced in § 7-1531.04, § 7-1531.05, § 7-1531.07, and § 7-1531.08.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (2006).